Indiana, session 2026, HB1077.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-8-2-131.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 131.9. (a) "Inland lake", for
purposes of IC 14-15-3, means a reasonably permanent body of
water that:
(1) is naturally occurring or human made;
(2) is substantially at rest in a depression in the surface of the
earth;
(3) covers an area of at least five (5) acres within the shoreline
and water line, including bays and coves; and
(4) is entirely surrounded by land.
(b) The term does not include Lake Michigan.
SECTION 2. IC 14-8-2-307.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 307.5. "Water recreation flag"
for purposes of IC 14-15-3, means a flag that:
(1) is at least twelve (12) inches wide by twelve (12) inches
2026 IN 1077—LS 6280/DI 150


high;
(2) is square or rectangular, approximately four (4) units high
by five (5) units long;
(3) is a bright orange or red color; and
(4) is mounted on a handle and displayed as to be visible from
all directions.
SECTION 3. IC 14-15-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.111-2016,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) This section does not apply to the following:
(1) A sailboard or windsurfing board.
(2) A manually propelled boat, such as a racing shell, rowing
scull, or racing kayak:
(A) that is recognized by national or international racing
associations for use in competitive racing;
(B) in which all occupants row, scull, or paddle, with the
exception of a coxswain if a coxswain is provided; and
(C) that is designed to carry and carries equipment only for
competitive racing.
(b) All boats must be equipped with the number and type of
personal flotation devices listed in this subsection. A person may not
operate a boat unless the boat contains:
(1) for each person on board, one (1) personal flotation device
that meets the requirements for designation by the United States
Coast Guard as a wearable personal flotation device; and
(2) for a boat, except a canoe or kayak, at least sixteen (16) feet
in length and in addition to the requirements of subdivision (1),
one (1) personal flotation device that meets the requirements for
designation by the United States Coast Guard as a throwable
personal flotation device.
(c) A person towed by a motorboat shall wear a personal
flotation device.
(c) (d) The director may waive the requirements of this section for
a boat during competition in a boat race for which a permit has been
issued by the department if the following conditions are met:
(1) The sponsor of the boat race has informed the director of the
precautions the sponsor will take to minimize the safety hazards
that exist due to noncompliance with the requirements of this
section.
(2) The sponsor files with the director a document under which
the sponsor assumes all liability that may result from the use of a
boat under the waiver.
SECTION 4. IC 14-15-3-8.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 1077—LS 6280/DI 150


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. A person operating a boat on an inland lake shall
operate the vessel in a counter-clockwise fashion to the extent that
it is reasonably possible.
SECTION 5. IC 14-15-3-20 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) A person
operating a motorboat may not tow a water ski, a watersled, an
aquaplane, or a similar object, including a person on the waterski,
watersled, aquaplane, or similar object, unless:
(1) the motorboat is occupied by at least one (1) other person who
is giving the person's entire attention to watching the object or
person towed; and
(2) the person operating the boat is giving the person's entire
attention to the operation of the boat.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person operating a
motorboat may not tow any object or person between sunset and
sunrise.
(c) A person operating a motorboat may tow a distressed boat
between sunset and sunrise.
SECTION 6. IC 14-15-3-20.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20.5. A person in a motorboat
shall observe the person towed by the boat and display a water
recreation flag immediately after the towed person:
(1) enters into the water; and
(2) during the time preparatory to:
(A) towing; or
(B) retrieving;
the person in the water.
SECTION 7. IC 14-15-3-31, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2014,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 31. (a) A person who violates section 2, 3, 5, 7, 8,
8.5, 9, 10, 14, 15, 16, 17, 20, 20.5, 22, 23, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, or 30
of this chapter commits a Class C infraction.
(b) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates section 6 of
this chapter commits a Class C misdemeanor.
2026 IN 1077—LS 6280/DI 150